Utah statutes.
58-28-602.   Cruelty to animals -- Immunity for reporting.

A licensed veterinarian who in good faith and in the normal course of business, reports a suspected case of animal cruelty to law enforcement or the proper authorities is immune from liability in any civil or criminal action brought against the veterinarian for reporting the suspected cruelty.



Enacted by Chapter 109, 2006 General Session

